Tennessee, session 114, SB1149.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-5-305(b), is amended by deleting
subdivision (7) and substituting the following:
(7) Has completed two (2) years of apprenticeship in the presence of and under
the direction and supervision of a licensed funeral director. An associate degree, or the
completion of a program of study in funeral service education, as provided in subdivision
(b)(6), may be substituted for one (1) year of apprenticeship.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-5-305, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(c)
(1) The completion of thirty (30) semester hours or forty-five (45) quarter
hours in funeral service education or the equivalent from a school accredited by
the American Board of Funeral Service Education, as provided in subdivision
(b)(6), may be substituted for one (1) year of apprenticeship.
(2) The applicant may fulfill the hourly educational requirement under
subdivision (b)(6) and substitute such hours for one (1) year of apprenticeship
under subdivision (c)(1) and complete the second year of apprenticeship
concurrently in a single calendar year.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1149
002284
- 1 -